Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.270

Legal owner.

"Legal owner" means a person having a security interest in a vehicle perfected in accordance with chapter 46.12 RCW or the registered owner of a vehicle unencumbered by a security interest or the lessor of a vehicle unencumbered by a security interest.

[ 1975 c 25 s 1; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.270. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 28; prior: 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part.]